Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Powers and Duties of Departments of Public Safety and Administration.

Sec. 28.05.010.
Powers and duties. [Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.05.011.
Duty of commissioners to adopt regulations.

The commissioner of public safety shall, unless otherwise provided by statute, adopt regulations in compliance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and other statutes whose administration is vested in the Department of Public Safety. The regulations must include

rules of the road relating to the driving, stopping, standing, parking, and other conduct of vehicles, to pedestrians, and to official traffic control devices; regulations adopted under this paragraph may not prohibit the use of an electric personal motor vehicle on a sidewalk, bike path, or vehicular way or area restricted to the use of pedestrians; limitations on regulation of electric personal motor vehicles imposed under this paragraph do not apply to a municipal ordinance regulating electric personal motor vehicles enacted to meet local requirements;

minimum equipment for vehicles, including minimum standards of compliance to be met by manufacturers and vehicle sales and repairs businesses;

inspection of vehicles other than commercial motor vehicles, and the removal of vehicles from areas of public use when they are found to be in a defective or unsafe condition;

abandonment of vehicles;

management of records of the Department of Public Safety required for that department’s administration of this title and its regulations adopted under this title, including provisions for ensuring the accuracy of information contained in automated and manual information retrieval systems;

definitions of words and phrases used in this title and in regulations adopted under this title unless otherwise provided by statute;

certification and regulation of junk yards.

The commissioner of administration shall, unless otherwise provided by statute, adopt regulations in compliance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to carry out the provisions of this title whose administration is vested in the Department of Administration. The regulations must include, but are not limited to,

registration, titling, and transfer of vehicles;

licensing of drivers of vehicles and procedures for obtaining limited license privileges;

financial responsibility relating to vehicles other than commercial motor vehicles;

management of records of the Department of Administration required for that department’s administration of this title and its regulations adopted under this title, including provisions for ensuring the accuracy of information contained in automated and manual information retrieval systems;

definitions of words and phrases used in this title and in regulations adopted under this title unless otherwise provided by statute;

registration of motor vehicle, trailer, and semi-trailer dealers;

regulations necessary to implement a commercial motor vehicle driver’s licensing program; regulations adopted under this paragraph must provide for a waiver of the driver skills test for drivers with recent military commercial vehicle driving experience as allowed by federal law.

If the department publishes a manual related to the safe and lawful operation of a motor vehicle, the manual must include the rights and responsibilities of drivers when encountering or being stopped by a peace officer.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 77 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 98 § 5 (1997); am E.O. No. 99 §§ 24, 25 (1997); am § 1 ch 142 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 80 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2013; am § 7 ch 8 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under § 18, E.O. 98, § 5 of E.O. 98 and §§ 24 and 25 of E.O. 99 were reconciled by deleting from subsection (a) duties concerning financial responsibility for commercial motor vehicles and a commercial motor vehicle safety inspection program and by, in paragraph (a)(3), inserting “other than commercial motor vehicles” after “inspection of vehicles.”

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to commercial motor vehicles, see AS

19.10.060

and

19.10.300

-

19.10.399

; for provisions relating to size, weight, and load limitations, see AS

19.10.060

; for transitional provisions concerning the 1997 transfer of functions, see § 17, E.O. 98 and § 77, E.O. 99.

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

For classified driver's licenses, see 2 AAC 90, art. 4.

For traffic offenses demerit point system, see 2 AAC 90, art. 5.

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

For mandatory auto insurance, see 2 AAC 90, art. 7.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 90, art. 8.

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 92, art. 3.

For hearings, see 2 AAC 93, art. 1.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 93, art. 2.

For traffic-control devices, see 13 AAC 2, art. 1.

For use of roadway, see 13 AAC 2, art. 2.

For right-of-way, see 13 AAC 2, art. 3.

For pedestrian rights and duties, see 13 AAC 2, art. 4.

For turning, starting, and signals on turning — starting and stopping, see 13 AAC 2, art. 5.

For special stops required, see 13 AAC 2, art. 6.

For speed restrictions, see 13 AAC 2, art. 7.

For stopping, standing and parking, see 13 AAC 2, art. 8.

For special rules for bicycles, nonmotorized conveyances, motorcycles, and motor-driven cycles, see 13 AAC 2, art. 9.

For special rules for snowmobiles and other off-highway vehicles, see 13 AAC 2, art. 10.

For traffic-control devices, see 13 AAC 3, art. 1.

For use of roadway, see 13 AAC 3, art. 2.

For pedestrian rights and duties, see 13 AAC 3, art. 3.

For speed restrictions, see 13 AAC 3, art. 4.

For scope and effect of regulations — standards and inspections, see 13 AAC 4, art. 1.

For lighting equipment, see 13 AAC 4, art. 2.

For brakes and other equipment, see 13 AAC 4, art. 4.

For equipment on motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, and bicycles, see 13 AAC 4, art. 5.

For equipment on snowmobiles and off-highway vehicles, see 13 AAC 4, art. 6.

For forensic alcohol testing, see 13 AAC 63.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective August 31, 2013, in (b)(7), added “; regulations adopted under this paragraph must provide for a waiver of the driver skills test for drivers with recent military commercial vehicle driving experience as allowed by federal law.”

The 2017 amendment, effective August 17, 2017, added (c).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Statutes may be enforced on streets not within state highway system. The Department of Public Safety has the authority to enforce all traffic statutes and regulations upon dedicated or public subdivision streets, regardless of whether they are in the state highway system. 1965 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Sec. 28.05.015.
Wheeled adjuncts.

The department shall, unless prohibited by an ordinance of a governmental subdivision of the state, allow pedestrians to use wheeled adjuncts, such as rollerblades, roller skates, and roller skis, on roadways and vehicular ways in addition to areas available for use by bicycles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

28.05.011(c)

and renumbered in 2004.

Sec. 28.05.020.
Authority of highway commissioner. [Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.05.021.
Commissioners to enter compacts and reciprocal agreements.

The commissioner of administration may, under terms and conditions best calculated to promote the interests of the state, enter into a compact or agreement with an authorized representative of another jurisdiction in a matter relating to driver licensing, vehicle registration, or other activity authorized under this title, the administration of which is vested in the Department of Administration. The commissioner of public safety may, under the same terms and conditions, enter into a compact or agreement with an authorized representative of another jurisdiction in a matter relating to an activity authorized under this title, the administration of which is vested in the Department of Public Safety. A compact or agreement affecting state finances or driving privileges must be approved by adoption of a concurrent resolution approved by a majority vote of each house of the legislature before it becomes effective.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 47 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am E.O. No. 99 § 26 (1997))

Secs. 28.05.025,
28.05.030.
Authority of Department of Commerce and public safety commissioner.
[Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.05.031.
Department of Public Safety to publish statutes and regulations relating to vehicles, vehicle use, and pedestrians.

The Department of Public Safety shall publish current state statutes and regulations relating to vehicles and their driving or movement, to drivers of vehicles, and to pedestrians. The cost of publication shall be jointly shared by that department and other state agencies that administer statutes and regulations included in the publication prescribed under this section.

A single copy of a facsimile of the publication prescribed in (a) of this section shall be available to the public without charge at all offices of the Department of Administration that administer the statutes in this title and at all offices of the Department of Public Safety. However, a municipality may request and receive without charge a reasonable number of copies of the publication.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 27 (1997))

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Sec. 28.05.035.
Approval of accident prevention courses.

For the purposes of AS

21.96.025(a)(4)

, the commissioner may approve driver education courses intended to prevent motor vehicle accidents and promote safe driving practices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 9 SLA 1988; am § 222 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

21.96.025

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.025” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.025.

Sec. 28.05.040.
Duty of public safety commissioner. [Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.05.041.
Forms, applications, and oaths.

The commissioner of administration shall prescribe and provide suitable application forms, certificates of title and registration, driver’s licenses, and all other forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and regulations adopted under this title, the administration of which is vested in the Department of Administration. The commissioner of public safety shall prescribe and provide suitable forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and regulations adopted under this title, the administration of which is vested in the Department of Public Safety, including a standard citation form that meets the requirements of AS

12.25.175

and

12.25.200

and that is in a form necessary to identify the offender and the offense and otherwise necessary to meet the needs of the public safety and the administration of justice as required under AS

12.25.175

and

12.25.200

.

The Department of Administration shall examine and approve or disapprove any application for registration of, or certificate of title for, a vehicle, and for a driver’s license and any other application made to the department. The department may make any investigation it considers necessary and may require additional information before approving an application. The department shall reject an application if it is not satisfied with the genuineness, regularity, or legality of the application, the truth of a statement contained in it, or the adequacy or sufficiency of information requested by the department. The department shall reject an application when the applicant is not entitled to issuance of the registration, title, license, or permit for which the person is applying or for any other reason required by law.

The commissioner of public safety and officers and employees of the Department of Public Safety designated by that commissioner, and the commissioner of administration and officers and employees of the Department of Administration designated by that commissioner, may, for the purpose of administering this title and regulations adopted under this title, administer oaths and acknowledge signatures, and do so without charging a fee.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 76 SLA 1987; am E.O. No. 99 § 28 (1997); am § 39 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

For driver training schools and instructors, see 2 AAC 91, art. 1.

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in the second sentence of (a), substituted “AS

12.25.175

and

12.25.200

” for “AS

12.25.200

” following “meets the requirements of” and substituted “AS

12.25.175

and 12.25.200” for “that section” following “justice as required under”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 28.05.045.
Voter registration.

The administrative component of the department that administers motor vehicle and driver’s license laws shall comply with AS

15.07.055

to serve as a voter registration agency to the extent required by state and federal law, including 42 U.S.C. 1973gg (National Voter Registration Act of 1993) and this section. A state resident, who will be 18 years of age or older within 90 days, who applies in an office of the department for a driver’s license, identification card issued under AS

18.65.310

, or vehicle registration under AS 28.10 shall at the time of application be advised by the division that the resident may also register to vote. The application submitted by the resident shall serve as an application for voter registration unless the resident fails to sign the voter registration portion of the application. The department shall forward completed voter registration forms to the division of elections. The department shall prominently display notice of the right to apply for voter registration at each place that the public may apply for a driver’s license, identification card, or vehicle registration.

History.

(§ 3 ch 47 SLA 1989; am § 15 ch 111 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 99 § 29 (1997))

Sec. 28.05.048.
Sex offender registration.

The department shall display notice of the registration requirements of AS

12.63.010

at a place where the public may apply for a driver’s license, identification card, or vehicle registration.

History.

(§ 6 ch 41 SLA 1994)

Sec. 28.05.050.
Publication of laws. [Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.05.051.
Suspended or revoked documents.

When the department suspends or revokes a vehicle registration, certificate of registration, registration plate, permit, or certificate of title or suspends, cancels, or revokes a license, the owner or person in possession of the document shall, immediately upon receiving notice of the suspension, revocation, or cancellation, mail or deliver the registration, certificate, plate, permit, or license to the department.

The commissioner, officers and employees of the department designated by the commissioner, judges and employees of a court, and all peace officers, may take possession of a certificate of title, registration, or license issued by this jurisdiction that has been revoked, canceled, limited, or suspended, or is fictitious, stolen, or altered.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1983)

Sec. 28.05.060.
School patrols. [Repealed, § 2 ch 68 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 28.05.061.
Records of departments and certified copies of records.

The Department of Administration shall file, maintain, and appropriately index records of

vehicle registrations under AS

28.10.071(a)

— (c);

stolen, converted, recovered, and unclaimed vehicles under AS

28.10.071(d)

;

titles and documents creating and evidencing liens or encumbrances under AS

28.10.381

;

abandoned vehicles under AS

28.11.030(c)

;

driver’s license and driving records under AS

28.15.151

;

applications under AS

28.10.262

for cancellation of a manufacturer’s certificate of origin for a manufactured home;

applications under AS

28.10.263

for cancellation of a certificate of title to a manufactured home;

applications under AS

28.10.264

for confirmation of the nonapplication of AS 28.10 to a manufactured home;

applications under AS

28.10.265

for a certificate of title to a severed manufactured home;

manufacturer’s certificates of origin accepted for cancellation by the department under AS

28.10.262

for a manufactured home; and

certificates of title accepted for cancellation by the department under AS

28.10.263

for a manufactured home.

The Department of Administration and the Department of Public Safety each may file and maintain any other records considered necessary for the respective department’s administration of this title and regulations adopted by that department under it.

Records maintained by the Department of Administration or the Department of Public Safety under this title or regulations adopted under this title may be stored in any reasonable manner, including electronic data storage. The commissioner of each of those departments and officers and employees of those departments designated by the respective commissioner shall, upon request, prepare under the seal of the respective department and deliver, unless otherwise prohibited by law, a certified copy of any record of that department maintained under this title or regulations adopted under this title, charging a fee for each certified copy. A certified copy of the record stored under this section is admissible in an administrative proceeding or in a court in the same manner as the original document.

If a copy of a motor vehicle record prepared or maintained by the Department of Administration is requested by the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, the department shall provide the requesting agency with a certified copy of the record. If information is prepared or maintained by the department in an electronic data base, the department may give the requesting agency a copy of the electronic record and a statement certifying its contents. The agency receiving information under this subsection may use the information only for child support purposes authorized under law.

For cancelled manufacturer’s certificates of origin, cancelled certificates of title, or applications for confirmation filed under (a)(8), (10), or (11) of this section, the department’s record must state

the name of each owner of the manufactured home;

the date the manufacturer’s certificate of origin or the certificate of title was accepted for cancellation if the certificate was cancelled under (a)(10) or (11) of this section; and

the recording information for the affixation affidavit required by AS

28.10.266

.

For applications for certificates of title under (a)(9) of this section, the department’s record must state the name of each owner of the manufactured home and the recording information for the severance affidavit recorded under AS

40.17.125

.

In this section, “recording information” means the district where the affidavit was recorded and the date and serial numbers of the affidavit’s recording in the recording district.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am § 140 ch 87 SLA 1997; am E.O. No. 99 § 30 (1997); am §§ 8, 9 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (d) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (a)(6) through (a)(11), and made a related stylistic change; and added (e), (f), and (g).

Sec. 28.05.065.
Access to criminal justice information.

For purposes of carrying out the provisions of AS 28.05, AS 28.15, AS 28.33, and AS 28.35, an employee of the department assigned to perform functions under those chapters may access criminal justice information about an adult or minor charged with or convicted of an offense.

For purposes of obtaining access to criminal justice information maintained by the Department of Public Safety under AS 12.62, the unit assigned motor vehicle functions in the Department of Administration is a criminal justice agency conducting a criminal justice activity.

In this section,

“criminal justice activity” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

;

“criminal justice agency” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 2007)

Sec. 28.05.068.
Prohibition on data sharing.

If the department conveys, distributes, or communicates data to be used in a database, index, pointer system, or any other system managed by an entity other than the department, including the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators, to comply with the requirements of P.L. 109-13, Division B (REAL ID Act of 2005), the department may not convey, distribute, or communicate to that entity any data not required to be conveyed, distributed, or communicated for the state to be certified by the United States Department of Homeland Security to be in compliance with the requirements of P.L. 109-13, Division B (REAL ID Act of 2005).

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may not convey, distribute, or communicate to a private entity any scanned or stored documents collected in order to carry out the provisions of AS 28.15.

The department shall take all steps available to obtain from the entity an agreement that the state need not convey, distribute, or communicate social security numbers, in whole or in part, to participate in the database, index, pointer system, or other system.

The department shall take all steps available to work with other states, the United States Department of Homeland Security, and any multistate entities in which the state participates to secure a means of compliance with P.L. 109-13, Division B (REAL ID Act of 2005), including through an interstate compact, that does not involve the storage or sharing of social security numbers, in whole or in part, with an interstate database, index, pointer system, or other system.

If the department has complied with (c) and (d) of this section and has been unable to secure a means of compliance with P.L. 109-13, Division B (REAL ID Act of 2005) that does not involve the storage or sharing of social security numbers, in whole or in part, the department shall take all steps necessary to minimize the number of digits of a social security number required to be stored or shared.

The department may share only the least number of digits of a person’s social security number necessary to comply with federal law that requires the department to determine whether a person has been issued a driver’s license in another state.

[Repealed, § 18 ch. 8 SLA 2017]

History.

(§ 8 ch 8 SLA 2017; am § 18 ch 8 SLA 2017)

Delayed repeal of subsection (g). —

Under sec. 18 , ch 8, SLA 2017, subsection (g) is repealed June 30, 2021.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 30, 2021, repealed (g).

Sec. 28.05.070.
Subpoenas; witnesses and documents. [Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.05.071.
Change of name or address.

A person who has applied for or been issued a certificate, registration, title, license, permit, or other form under this title, and who changes the person’s name or moves from the address shown on the records or forms of the Department of Administration or the Department of Public Safety, shall notify the appropriate department of the change in name or address within 30 days

on a form or in a format specified by the appropriate department; and

in a manner prescribed in regulations adopted by the appropriate department.

A person convicted of a violation of (a) of this section is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed $25.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 31 (1997); am § 2 ch 23 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2008)

Secs. 28.05.072 — 28.05.080.
Notice, hearing, and offense disposition. [Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]